Wisconsin, session 2025, AB532.
do enact as follows:AB532,11Section 1. 108.05 (1) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB532,2,32108.05 (1) (cm) For purposes of par. (r), the department shall set the 3maximum weekly benefit amount as follows:AB532,2,541. For benefits paid for a week of total unemployment that commences on or 5after January 5, 2014, but before January 4, 2026, $370.AB532,2,762. For benefits paid for a week of total unemployment that commences on or 7after January 4, 2026, but before January 3, 2027, $497.AB532,2,1083. For benefits paid for a week of total unemployment that commences on or 9after January 3, 2027, the department shall set the maximum weekly benefit 10amount as provided under sub. (2).AB532,211Section 2. 108.05 (1) (r) of the statutes is renumbered 108.05 (1) (r) (intro.) 12and amended to read:AB532,3,613108.05 (1) (r) (intro.) Except as provided in s. 108.062 (6) (a), each eligible 14employee shall be paid benefits for each week of total unemployment that 1commences on or after January 5, 2014, at the a weekly benefit rate specified in this 2paragraph. Unless sub. (1m) applies, the weekly benefit rate shall equal to 4 3percent of the employee’s base period wages that were paid during that quarter of 4the employee’s base period in which the employee was paid the highest total wages, 5rounded down to the nearest whole dollar, except that, if that amount as provided 6under sub. (1m) and except as follows:AB532,3,871. If the employee’s weekly benefit rate calculated under this paragraph is less 8than $54, no benefits are payable to the employee and, if that amount.AB532,3,1292. If the employee’s weekly benefit rate is more than $370 the maximum 10weekly benefit amount specified in par. (cm), the employee’s weekly benefit rate 11shall be $370 and except that, if the maximum weekly benefit amount specified in 12par. (cm).AB532,3,15133. If the employee’s benefits are exhausted during any week under s. 108.06 14(1), the employee shall be paid the remaining amount of benefits payable to the 15employee under s. 108.06 (1).AB532,3,1816(s) The department shall publish on its Internet site website a weekly benefit 17rate schedule of quarterly wages and the corresponding weekly benefit rates as 18calculated in accordance with this paragraph subsection.AB532,319Section 3. 108.05 (2) of the statutes is created to read:AB532,3,2320108.05 (2) Indexing. (a) For benefits paid or payable for a week that 21commences on or after January 3, 2027, the department shall set the maximum 22weekly benefit amount under sub. (1) (cm) 3. and the wage limitation under sub. (3) 23(dm) 2. c. by doing the following:AB532,4,511. Except as provided in subd. 2., calculating the percentage difference 2between the consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on July 31 of the 3prior year and the consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on July 31 4of the year before the prior year, adjusting the prior year’s amount or limitation by 5that percentage difference, and rounding that result to the nearest whole dollar.AB532,4,962. If the consumer price index for the 12-month period ending on July 31 of 7the prior year has not increased over the consumer price index for the 12-month 8period ending on July 31 of the year before the prior year, setting the amount or 9limitation at the same amount or limitation that was in effect in the previous year.AB532,4,1210(b) An adjustment under this subsection of the maximum weekly benefit 11amount under sub. (1) (cm) 3. and the wage limitation under sub. (3) (dm) 2. c. shall 12take effect on the first Sunday in January of each calendar year.AB532,413Section 4. 108.05 (3) (dm) of the statutes is renumbered 108.05 (3) (dm) 1. 14and amended to read:AB532,4,2115108.05 (3) (dm) 1. Except when otherwise authorized in an approved work-16share program under s. 108.062, a claimant is ineligible to receive any benefits for a 17week if the claimant receives or will receive from one or more employers wages 18earned for work performed in that week, amounts treated as wages under s. 108.04 19(1) (bm) for that week, sick pay, holiday pay, vacation pay, termination pay, bonus 20pay, back pay, or payments treated as wages under s. 108.04 (12) (e), or any 21combination thereof, totalling more than $500 the amount specified in subd. 2.AB532,522Section 5. 108.05 (3) (dm) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB532,4,2423108.05 (3) (dm) 2. The department shall set the wage limitation under subd. 241. as follows:AB532,5,11a. For a week of unemployment that commences before January 4, 2026, $500.AB532,5,32b. For a week of unemployment that commences on or after January 4, 2026, 3but before January 3, 2027, $672.AB532,5,54c. For a week of unemployment that commences on or after January 3, 2027, 5the department shall set the wage limitation as provided under sub. (2).AB532,66Section 6. 227.01 (13) (n) of the statutes is amended to read:AB532,5,97227.01 (13) (n) Fixes or approves rates, prices or charges, including a 8maximum weekly benefit amount or wage limitation under s. 108.05 (2), unless a 9statute specifically requires them to be fixed or approved by rule.AB532,5,1010